Illinois, session 104th, HB4977.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Hospital Licensing Act is amended by 5changing Sections 3 and 6.23 as follows: 6    (210 ILCS 85/3)7    Sec. 3. As used in this Act: 8    (A) "Hospital" means any institution, place, building, 9buildings on a campus, or agency, public or private, whether 10organized for profit or not, devoted primarily to the 11maintenance and operation of facilities for the diagnosis and 12treatment or care of 2 or more unrelated persons admitted for 13overnight stay or longer in order to obtain medical, including 14obstetric, psychiatric and nursing, care of illness, disease, 15injury, infirmity, or deformity.16    The term "hospital", without regard to length of stay, 17shall also include:18        (a) any facility which is devoted primarily to 19    providing psychiatric and related services and programs 20    for the diagnosis and treatment or care of 2 or more 21    unrelated persons suffering from emotional or nervous 22    diseases;23        (b) all places where pregnant females are received,   HB4977 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 20091 BAB 33542 b1    cared for, or treated during delivery irrespective of the 2    number of patients received; and3        (c) on and after January 1, 2023, a rural emergency 4    hospital, as that term is defined under subsection 5    (kkk)(2) of Section 1861 of the federal Social Security 6    Act; to provide for the expeditious and timely 7    implementation of this amendatory Act of the 102nd General 8    Assembly, emergency rules to implement the changes made to 9    the definition of "hospital" by this amendatory Act of the 10    102nd General Assembly may be adopted by the Department 11    subject to the provisions of Section 5-45 of the Illinois 12    Administrative Procedure Act. 13    The term "hospital" includes general and specialized 14hospitals, tuberculosis sanitaria, mental or psychiatric 15hospitals and sanitaria, and includes maternity homes, 16lying-in homes, and homes for unwed mothers in which care is 17given during delivery.18    The term "hospital" does not include:19        (1) any person or institution required to be licensed 20    pursuant to the Nursing Home Care Act, the Specialized 21    Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013, the ID/DD 22    Community Care Act, or the MC/DD Act;23        (2) hospitalization or care facilities maintained by 24    the State or any department or agency thereof, where such 25    department or agency has authority under law to establish 26    and enforce standards for the hospitalization or care   HB4977 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 20091 BAB 33542 b1    facilities under its management and control;2        (3) hospitalization or care facilities maintained by 3    the federal government or agencies thereof;4        (4) hospitalization or care facilities maintained by 5    any university or college established under the laws of 6    this State and supported principally by public funds 7    raised by taxation;8        (5) any person or facility required to be licensed 9    pursuant to the Substance Use Disorder Act;10        (6) any facility operated solely by and for persons 11    who rely exclusively upon treatment by spiritual means 12    through prayer, in accordance with the creed or tenets of 13    any well-recognized church or religious denomination;14        (7) an Alzheimer's disease management center 15    alternative health care model licensed under the 16    Alternative Health Care Delivery Act;17        (8) any veterinary hospital or clinic operated by a 18    veterinarian or veterinarians licensed under the 19    Veterinary Medicine and Surgery Practice Act of 2004 or 20    maintained by a State-supported or publicly funded 21    university or college; or 22        (9) a psychiatric residential treatment facility 23    certified under the Psychiatric Residential Treatment 24    Facilities (PRTF) Act. 25    (B) "Person" means the State, and any political 26subdivision or municipal corporation, individual, firm,   HB4977 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 20091 BAB 33542 b1partnership, corporation, company, association, or joint stock 2association, or the legal successor thereof.3    (C) "Department" means the Department of Public Health of 4the State of Illinois.5    (D) "Director" means the Director of Public Health of the 6State of Illinois.7    (D-5) "Pathogens of epidemiological concern" means any 8infectious agent that has one or more of the following 9characteristics:10        (1) a propensity for transmission within health care 11    facilities based on published reports from:12            (A) the Centers for Disease Control and 13        Prevention; or14            (B) the Department of Public Health;15        (2) the occurrence of temporal or geographic clusters 16    of 2 or more patients;17        (3) antimicrobial resistance implications;18        (4) association with serious clinical disease or 19    increased morbidity and mortality;20        (5) a newly discovered or reemerging pathogen; or21        (6) any other characteristic determined by a state or 22    local health department. 23    (E) "Perinatal" means the period of time between the 24conception of an infant and the end of the first month after 25birth.26    (F) "Federally designated organ procurement agency" means   HB4977 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 20091 BAB 33542 b1the organ procurement agency designated by the Secretary of 2the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services for the 3service area in which a hospital is located; except that in the 4case of a hospital located in a county adjacent to Wisconsin 5which currently contracts with an organ procurement agency 6located in Wisconsin that is not the organ procurement agency 7designated by the U.S. Secretary of Health and Human Services 8for the service area in which the hospital is located, if the 9hospital applies for a waiver pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 101320b-8(a), it may designate an organ procurement agency 11located in Wisconsin to be thereafter deemed its federally 12designated organ procurement agency for the purposes of this 13Act.14    (G) "Tissue bank" means any facility or program operating 15in Illinois that is certified by the American Association of 16Tissue Banks or the Eye Bank Association of America and is 17involved in procuring, furnishing, donating, or distributing 18corneas, bones, or other human tissue for the purpose of 19injecting, transfusing, or transplanting any of them into the 20human body. "Tissue bank" does not include a licensed blood 21bank. For the purposes of this Act, "tissue" does not include 22organs.23    (H) "Campus", as this term applies to operations, has the 24same meaning as the term "campus" as set forth in federal 25Medicare regulations, 42 CFR 413.65. 26(Source: P.A. 104-147, eff. 8-1-25.)   HB4977 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 20091 BAB 33542 b1    (210 ILCS 85/6.23)2    Sec. 6.23. Prevention and control of pathogens of 3epidemiological concern Multidrug-Resistant Organisms. 4    (a) Each hospital shall develop and implement 5comprehensive interventions to prevent and control pathogens 6of epidemiological concern multidrug-resistant organisms 7(MDROs), including methicillin-resistant Staphylococcus 8aureus (MRSA), vancomycin-resistant enterococci (VRE), and 9certain gram-negative bacilli (GNB), that take into 10consideration guidelines of the U.S. Centers for Disease 11Control and Prevention or recommendations from (A) the 12Infectious Disease Society of America, (B) the Society for 13Healthcare Epidemiology of America, (C) the Association for 14Professionals in Infection Control and Epidemiology, and (D) 15the Pediatric Infectious Disease Society for the management of 16multidrug-resistant organisms MDROs in health care healthcare 17settings. The Department may also consider any other credible 18scientific bodies or organizations in adopting rules and 19developing policies and findings in relation to the management 20of multidrug-resistant organisms in health care settings. The 21Department shall adopt administrative rules that require 22hospitals to perform an annual facility-wide infection control 23risk assessment and enforce hand hygiene and contact 24precaution requirements.25    (b) Within 12 months after the effective date of this   HB4977 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 20091 BAB 33542 b1amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, each hospital 2shall adopt a policy for preventing and controlling the 3transmission of pathogens of epidemiological concern that 4shall, at a minimum, contain:5        (1) a facility risk assessment to identify pathogens 6    of epidemiological concern that considers elements such as 7    the probability of occurrence, as determined through 8    surveillance, the potential impact of a pathogen, and 9    measures the hospital has implemented to mitigate the risk 10    to patients, health care workers, and visitors; and11        (2) appropriate evidence-based procedures and 12    intervention strategies to identify patients carrying 13    pathogens of epidemiological concern and to help prevent 14    patients from transmitting pathogens of epidemiological 15    concern to other patients and health care workers.16    (c) A hospital that has, through appropriate testing, 17identified a patient who has a pathogen of epidemiological 18concern shall report the patient to the United States 19Department of Health and Human Services or the National 20Healthcare Safety Network of the United States Centers for 21Disease Control and Prevention, as required by the Department 22of Public Health or the United States Centers for Medicare and 23Medicaid services.24(Source: P.A. 95-282, eff. 8-20-07; 95-876, eff. 8-21-08.) 25    (210 ILCS 83/Act rep.)  HB4977 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 20091 BAB 33542 b1    Section 10. The MRSA Screening and Reporting Act is 2repealed.